District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.201

Council Technology Projects Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Council Technology Projects Fund (“Fund”). All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(b)

The Fund shall be used for capital expenses, or for operating expenses related to furniture, fixtures, equipment, or maintaining or upgrading the technology used for the benefit of the Council and shall be administered by the Secretary to the Council.

(c)

The following shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

All excess monies remaining in the operating budget for the Council of the District of Columbia at the end of each fiscal year;

(2)

Any interest earned from the monies deposited into the Fund; and

(3)

Any other funds received on behalf of the Fund or the Council for the purpose of maintaining and upgrading the technology for the Council.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1082, 58 DCR 6226
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 9002, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “for capital expenses, or for operating expenses related to furniture, fixtures, equipment, or maintaining or upgrading the technology used for the benefit of the Council and shall be administered by the Secretary to the Council” for “solely for the purposes of maintaining and upgrading the technology used for the benefit of the Council and shall be administered by the Council's Chief Technology Officer” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Short title: Section 1081 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle H of title I of the act may be cited as “Council Technology Projects Fund Establishment Act of 2011”.